src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb stems
Briathra Gaeilge - Irregular
E. Uí Dhonnchadha
14/10/96
- (1) New Irish Grammar by The Christian Brothers  
- (2) Gramadach na Gaeilge agus Litriú na Gaeilge - An Caighdeán Oifigiúil
- (3) Foclóir Póca - An Gúm
- (4) Nuachúrsa Gaeilge na mBráithre Críostaí
- (5) Ó Dónaill Irish-English Dictionary

```
oct 2004 - removed PastSubj
may 2012 - added +Suf, +Var, +Typo and tidied many things
dec 2019 - added non-std fuair for bardic
****************************************************************************
! First Conjugation Verb Stems
------------------------------------------------------------------------
V1-BR: 	one syllable (broad vowel - gutha leathan)
------------------------------------------------------------------------
V1-SL: 	one syllable (slender vowel - gutha caol )
------------------------------------------------------------------------
V1-BR-LV: Broad F-sufixes Slender T-suffixes (áigh, eoigh, óigh, uaigh, úigh)
------------------------------------------------------------------------
V!-SL-LV: Slender F-suffixes Slender T-suffixes (verbs ending in -éigh ) p99
------------------------------------------------------------------------
V1-SV:	Slender F Slender T ( verbs ending in -igh preceded
		by a cons. or cons. + short vowel ) p100
------------------------------------------------------------------------
V1-SL-BR:	eisceachtaí do V1-SL; e.g. siúil
		leathnaítear iad SEACHAS
		a) Imperative 2P Sg, e.g. siúil
		b) All of Past Ind. except 1P Pl, e.g. shiúlamar
------------------------------------------------------------------------
V1-BR-SL:	eisceachtaí do V1-BR; a mhalairt de V1-SL-BR; e.g. tafann 
		caolaítear agus coimrítear iad SEACHAS
		a) Imperative 2P Sg, e.g. tafann
		b) All of Past Ind. except 1P Pl, e.g. ????
------------------------------------------------------------------------
V1-SL-X:	eisceachtaí do V1-SL; leathnaítear iad ; 
		?? polysyllabic with stress on second syllable  
		is this a reason why they are in the first declension?
------------------------------------------------------------------------
V1-SL-LC:	ends in áil
```
-  **LEXICON VerbsC1A** 

-  mol+Verb+VTI:mol V1-BR; 
-  glac+Verb+VT:glac V1-BR;  ta -. tha (glactha)
-  lúb+Verb+VTI:lúb V1-BR; 

Second Conjugation Verb Stems

DEFECTIVE VERBS

SOME COMMON COMPOUNDS
leave out _fios from lemma as it prevents some bí CG rules applying
IRREGULAR VERBS

Irregular Verbs

auto does not lenite

varient
varient
varient
varient
varient
varient
varient
varient	

auto does not lenite

Bardic - historical nonstandard spellings

FORMS NOT LENITED IN POSITIVE PAST TENSE incl IMPERFECT

Mixed Verb Stems

NEEDS FURTHER TESTING OF -X WORDS
and TEST

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc)</small>
